Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.510

Receivership—State medical assistance.

If the nursing home is providing care to recipients of state medical assistance, the receiver shall become the medicaid contractor for the duration of the receivership period and shall assume all reporting and other responsibilities required by applicable laws and regulations. The receiver shall be responsible for the refund of medicaid rate payments in excess of costs during the period of the receivership.

[ 1987 c 476 s 20.]